Nebraska, session 109, LB665.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB665 LB665
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 54-2901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2901 Sections 54-2901 to 54-2957 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Animal Health and Disease Control Act.
Sec. 2. Section 54-2902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2902 For purposes of sections 54-753.05 and 54-797 to 54-7,103
and the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 54-2903 to 54-2938
and section 3 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Foreign adversary means any foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15
C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Section 54-2939, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2939 (1) The Legislature finds and declares it is the policy of
this state that:
(a) Animal animal health and disease control are essential to the
livestock industry and the health of the economy of Nebraska; .
(b) It is in the economic and cultural interest of Nebraska to
protect and conserve livestock resources;
(c) Protection of private property rights, as they pertain to
livestock husbandry and management, supersede the interests of government
bureaucracy; and
(d) Foreign adversaries who can leverage surveillance technology to
disrupt the integrity of domestic livestock production present a threat
to the security and sovereignty of Nebraska and the United States of
America.
(2) The purpose of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act is to
further the best interests of Nebraska's livestock industry and to grow
Nebraska agriculture.
-2-

LB665 LB665
2025 2025
(3) In carrying out its duty to protect the health of Nebraska's
livestock, the department may use USDA/APHIS/VS program standards to
determine and employ the most efficient and practical means for the
prevention, suppression, control, and eradication of dangerous diseases
among livestock and transmissible from other animals to livestock.
Sec. 5. Section 54-2948, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2948 (1) Livestock imported into Nebraska shall comply with
federal animal disease traceability requirements for official
identification of animals as set forth in 9 C.F.R. part 86, as such part
existed on January 1, 2020, which the Legislature hereby adopts by
reference. If there is an inconsistency between such federal regulations
and the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, and any adopted and
promulgated rules or regulations or order issued by the department, the
requirements of the act, rules or regulations, or order control.
(2) An official identification device or method may be applied by an
animal's owner, the owner's representative, an accredited veterinarian,
or an approved tagging site. Official identification devices are intended
to provide permanent identification of livestock and to ensure the
ability to find the source of animal disease outbreaks. Removal of these
devices is prohibited except at the time of slaughter, upon the death of
the animal at any location, when an area veterinarian in charge replaces
a device, or as otherwise approved by the department.
(3) The application of any electronic identification device for
livestock manufactured by an entity with direct or indirect ties to any
foreign adversary is prohibited within this state.
(4) The department shall not require the application or use of any
foreign manufactured device for electronic animal identification for the
purpose of identifying or tracking the movement of any livestock.
Sec. 6. Original sections 54-2901, 54-2902, 54-2939, and 54-2948,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-